District of Columbia statutes.
32-1368

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 9, 59 DCR 2391
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7007, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “as of October 1, 2015” for “upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-132, § 9, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).